Tennessee, session 114, SB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-345, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting the following:
4-1-345. Official state foods.
The official state foods of this state are as follows:
(1) Hot slaw;
(2) Memphis barbecue; and
(3) Nashville hot chicken.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-349, is amended by deleting the
section in its entirety.
SECTION 3. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1216
000626
- 1 -